District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.99

Fees; rules.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subchapter, including sections 47-2853.10 and 47-2853.11:

(1)

(A)

The fee for the issuance, renewal, or reinstatement of a license under this part shall be $260; provided, that this fee shall not apply to elevator mechanics employed by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

(B)

Application fees paid under this section shall not be refundable, even if the applicant withdraws his or her application for licensure, certification, or registration, or is found to be not qualified.

(2)

(A)

All fees collected under this part shall be deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

(b)

On or before December 31, 2009, the Mayor, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this part.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2151(f), 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).